apertium-sco.sco.dix
<pardef n="cr/y__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ies</l>         <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ied</l>          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ied</l>          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yin</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yin</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yin</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="dee__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>'d</l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>'d</l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="d/ing__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ings</l>         <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ang</l>          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ung</l>          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingin</l>        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingin</l>        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingin</l>        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="dunch__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="e/at__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>at</l>          <r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>at</l>          <r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ats</l>         <r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tt</l>          <r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aten</l>        <r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>atin</l>        <r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>atin</l>        <r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>atin</l>        <r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="f/aw__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>aw</l>          <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aw</l>          <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aws</l>         <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ell</l>         <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>awen</l>        <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>awin</l>        <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>awin</l>        <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>awin</l>        <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="fe/el__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>el</l>          <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>el</l>          <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>els</l>         <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lt</l>          <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lt</l>          <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>elin</l>        <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>elin</l>        <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>elin</l>        <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="f/ind__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ind</l>          <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ind</l>          <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inds</l>         <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>and</l>          <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>und</l>          <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>indin</l>        <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>indin</l>        <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>indin</l>        <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="fl/ing__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ings</l>         <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ang</l>          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ung</l>          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingin</l>        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingin</l>        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingin</l>        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ga/e__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>           <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>           <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ein</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ein</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ein</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ga/n__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>           <r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>           <r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ns</l>          <r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>          <r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>          <r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>un</l>          <r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>un</l>          <r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>un</l>          <r>n<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="dee">               <i>dee</i><par n="dee__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ding">              <i>d</i><par n="d/ing__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="eat">               <i>e</i><par n="e/at__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="faw">               <i>f</i><par n="f/aw__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="feel">              <i>fe</i><par n="fe/el__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="find">              <i>f</i><par n="f/ind__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fling">             <i>fl</i><par n="fl/ing__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gae">               <i>ga</i><par n="ga/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gan">               <i>ga</i><par n="ga/n__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cry">              <i>cr</i><par n="cr/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dunch">            <i>dunch</i><par n="dunch__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pairty">           <i>pairty</i><par n="cr/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="polis">            <i>polis</i><par n="dunch__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="teach">            <i>t</i><par n="dunch__vblex"/></e>
